Hawaii statutes.
§88-185 Assistants; county clerk,
attorney, and treasurer. The county clerk shall be the ex officio
secretary of the pension board of the clerk's county and shall keep in a
separate book a true and correct account of the proceedings of the board. The
county attorney shall be the legal advisor of the board of the attorney's
county; provided that the board, with the approval of the council of the
county, may employ private legal counsel. The county treasurer shall be the ex
officio treasurer of the board of the treasurer's county. The county auditor
shall audit all accounts of the pension fund of the county and the county
auditor shall draw all warrants payable therefrom, which warrants shall be
drawn only upon a voucher certified by the chairperson, or acting chairperson,
and one other member of the board. The county treasurer shall collect all
moneys belonging to the fund, have the custody of all its notes, bonds, and
other securities, if any, and collect the principal and interest of the same,
and the treasurer shall be liable on the treasurer's bond as treasurer for the
faithful accounting of all moneys that may come into the treasurer's hands
belonging to the pension fund. The treasurer shall, upon the expiration of the
treasurer's term of office, account to the board for all moneys, notes, bonds,
and other securities coming into the treasurer's hands and the proceeds of the
same, and turn over to the treasurer's successor all moneys, notes, and other
securities remaining in the treasurer's hands and belonging to the pension
fund. [L 1937, c 237, §1; am L 1939, c 112, pt of §1(a); am L 1941, c 249, §1;
RL 1945, pt of §6184; RL 1955, §6-164; HRS §88-185; am L 1998, c 124, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next